Massachusetts, session 194th, H1451.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 66 of the General Laws is amended by adding at the end a new section:
Section 22: Public colleges and universities as defined in Section 5 of Chapter 15A shall
not be required to produce records defined as education records in the Family Education Rights
and Privacy Act (20 USC 11232g) at 34 CFR § 99.3, including those education records
designated by the public colleges and universities as directory information as defined in FERPA
at 34 CFR § 99.3.
of 1